Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.694

Remaining assets—Distribution.

When all expenses of the receivership have been paid, as well as all proper claims of share account holders, depositors, and other creditors, and proper provision has been made for unclaimed or unpaid debts and liquidation dividends, and assets of the credit union still remain, the receiver shall wind up the affairs of the credit union and distribute its assets to those entitled to them. Each share account holder and depositor at the credit union is entitled to a proportionate share of the assets remaining. The proportionate allocation shall be based on account balances as of a date determined by the board. For the purposes of liquidation, shares and deposits are equivalent.

[ 1997 c 397 s 77.]